Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1362XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1362XD (7) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 8.23, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3. A transmittal to the department of
management pursuant to this section, and any document created
based on such transmittal, shall be considered confidential
until the governor transmits the budget in accordance with
section 8.21.
Sec. 2. Section 8.57C, subsections 2, 3, and 4, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
2. Moneys in the fund in a fiscal year shall be used as
appropriated by the general assembly for the acquisition
of computer hardware and software, software development,
telecommunications equipment, and maintenance and lease
agreements associated with technology components and for the
purchase of equipment intended to provide an uninterruptible
power supply are appropriated to the department of management
to provide a stable funding source for implementation costs
of state information technology projects that enhance the
state’s technology infrastructure, improve government services,
and promote innovation and economic development, including
but not limited to new information technology projects
and infrastructure replacement efforts of a department or
establishment.
a. The department shall prioritize proposed projects based
on all of the following considerations:
(1) Whether the project aligns with the state’s strategic
priorities.
(2) Whether the project promotes or introduces new
technology or significantly improves an existing system.
(3) Whether the project is feasible and whether the
department or establishment has established readiness for the
project to proceed, including a clear assessment of timelines,
budgets, and measurable outcomes.
(4) Whether the project includes a clear change management
strategy to support user adoption and aligns with lean
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-1- sc/ns 1/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
enterprise principles to maximize value, minimize waste, and
ensure continuous improvement.
(5) Whether the project provides a positive return on
investment, considering both financial returns and nonfinancial
benefits such as improved public safety, education, or health
care.
(6) Whether the project results in infrastructure that is
scalable across the state enterprise.
(7) Whether the department or establishment has identified
how the completed project will be sustained beyond the initial
funding period.
(8) Whether the project improves access to governmental
services, particularly in rural communities.
(9) Whether the project involves an infrastructure project
as opposed to maintenance or standard upgrades of existing
technology.
b. The department shall provide a prioritized list of
proposed projects for funding to the governor, who shall use
the list in developing a budgetary recommendation for the
general assembly pursuant to section 8.21.
3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the
state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, and for each subsequent fiscal year
thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred thousand
dollars.
b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa
infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023,
and ending June 30, 2024, the sum of eighteen million three
hundred ninety thousand two hundred ninety dollars to the
technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 8.57,
subsection 3, paragraph “c”.
c. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa
infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024,
and ending June 30, 2025, the sum of twenty-one million one
hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-2- sc/ns 2/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section
8.57, subsection 3, paragraph “c”.
b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund
that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a
fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for
expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding
section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in
the fund shall be credited to the fund.
4. Annually, on On or before January 15 of each year, a
state agency that received an appropriation from this fund
the department of management shall report to the legislative
services agency and the department of management general
assembly the status of all projects funded under this section
that have been completed since the previous report was
submitted or that are in progress. The report shall must
include a description of the project, the progress of work
completed, the total estimated cost of the project, a list of
all revenue sources being used to fund the project, the amount
of funds moneys expended, the amount of funds moneys obligated,
and the date the project was completed or an estimated
completion date of the project, where applicable.
Sec. 3. Section 8.78, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
8.78 Background checks.
An applicant for employment with the department, or
an applicant for employment with a supported entity for a
position as information technology staff, may be subject to a
background investigation by the department. The background
investigation may include, without limitation, a work history,
financial review, request for criminal history data, and
national criminal history check through the federal bureau of
investigation. In addition, a contractor, vendor, employee, or
any other individual performing work for the department, or an
individual on the information technology staff of a supported
entity, may be subject to a national criminal history check
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-3- sc/ns 3/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
through the federal bureau of investigation at least once
every ten five years, including, without limitation, any time
the department or supported entity has reason to believe an
individual has been convicted of a crime. The department may
request the national criminal history check and, if requested,
shall provide the individual’s fingerprints to the department
of public safety for submission through the state criminal
history repository to the federal bureau of investigation.
The individual shall authorize release of the results of the
national criminal history check to the department and the
applicable supported entity. The department shall pay the
actual cost of the fingerprinting and national criminal history
check, if any, unless otherwise agreed as part of a contract
between the department or supported entity and a vendor or
contractor performing work for the department or supported
entity. The results of a criminal history check conducted
pursuant to this section shall not be considered a public
record under chapter 22.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 8.94 Contracts —— prohibited terms.
Provisions included in a contract entered into pursuant to
this subchapter that impose terms or conditions prohibited by
this section are void ab initio as contrary to public policy.
Such a contract shall be interpreted and enforced as if the
contract did not include the prohibited terms or conditions.
Prohibited terms and conditions include all of the following:
1. A provision requiring the department or a supported
entity to defend, indemnify, hold harmless another person, or
otherwise assume the debt or liability of another person in
violation of Article VII, section 1, of the Constitution of the
State of Iowa.
2. A provision that seeks to impose a term that is unknown
to the department or supported entity at the time of signing
the contract or that can be unilaterally changed by an entity
other than the department or a supported entity.
3. A provision that violates chapter 13 by not allowing
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-4- sc/ns 4/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the department or a supported entity to participate in its own
defense through representation by the attorney general.
4. A provision that grants to a person other than the
attorney general the authority to convey to a court or litigant
the state’s consent to any settlement of a suit involving the
contract when such settlement could impose liability on the
state.
5. A provision that specifies that the contract is governed
by the laws of a foreign state or nation.
6. A provision that claims blanket confidentiality of the
contract’s terms.
7. A provision that claims that payment terms, including but
not limited to cost proposals or other pricing information, of
the contract are confidential.
8. A provision that authorizes or requires a venue for
litigation other than the district court of Polk county, Iowa,
or the United States district court for the southern district
of Iowa sitting in Des Moines, Iowa.
9. A provision that requires the department or a supported
entity to pay attorney fees, court costs, or other litigation
expenses in the event of a contractual dispute.
10. A provision that imposes on the department or a
supported entity binding arbitration or any other binding
extrajudicial dispute resolution process in which the final
resolution is not determined by the state.
11. A provision that waives the department’s or a supported
entity’s right to a jury trial.
12. A provision that obligates the department or a supported
entity to pay late payment charges not consistent with section
8A.514, interest greater than allowed under section 8A.514 or
other applicable law, or any cancellation charges, as such
charges constitute pledges of the state’s credit.
13. A provision that obligates the department or a supported
entity to pay a tax.
14. A provision that imposes a prior notice obligation
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-5- sc/ns 5/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
on the department or a supported entity as a condition for
the automatic renewal of a software license. The department
or a supported entity may provide notice of its intent to
terminate a software license at any time before the renewal
date established in the contract.
15. A provision that obligates the department or a supported
entity to accept risk of loss before the receipt of items or
goods.
16. A provision that obligates the department or a supported
entity to have commercial insurance.
17. A provision that obligates the department or a supported
entity to grant to a nongovernmental entity full or partial
ownership of intellectual property developed pursuant to the
contract when the intellectual property is developed in whole
or in part using federal funding.
18. A provision that limits the time in which the department
or a supported entity may bring a legal claim under the
contract to a period shorter than that provided in Iowa law.
19. A boilerplate provision included in transactional
documents received by the department or a supported entity that
seeks to alter the terms of the contract or to impose new terms
in the contract.
Sec. 5. NEW SECTION. 8.95 Contracts —— required terms.
All of the following provisions shall be deemed to be
included in a contract entered into by the department or a
supported entity under this subchapter:
1. Governing Law. The contract shall be governed by
the laws of the state of Iowa, without giving effect to any
conflicts of law principles of Iowa law that may require the
application of another jurisdiction’s law.
2. Venue. Any litigation commenced in connection with the
contract shall be brought and maintained in the district court
of Polk county, Iowa, or the United States district court for
the southern district of Iowa sitting in Des Moines, Iowa, as
appropriate.
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-6- sc/ns 6/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 6. NEW SECTION. 8.96 Contracts —— limitation of
liability —— prohibited terms.
Notwithstanding section 8A.311, subsection 22, and rules
adopted pursuant to that subsection, the director may include
a contractual limitation of vendor liability in information
technology goods and services contracts. A contractual
limitation of vendor liability must take into consideration the
public interest and the mitigation of risks associated with the
use of information technology goods or services. Any portion
of a contractual limitation of vendor liability that includes
a repudiation of all liability for cybersecurity incidents or
a limitation on the vendor’s liability for intentional torts,
criminal acts, fraudulent conduct, intentional or willful
misconduct, gross negligence, death, bodily injury, damage to
real or personal property, intellectual property violations,
liquidated damages, compliance with applicable laws, violations
of confidential information obligations, or contractual
obligations of the vendor pertaining to indemnification shall
be void as a matter of law as contrary to public policy. A
contractual limit of vendor liability that does not apply
equally to the contracted parties or that limits a vendor’s
liability to less than the contract value inclusive of all
possible extensions is void as a matter of law as contrary to
public policy.
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 8.97 Confidentiality of communications
with chief information security officer.
In the interest of facilitating communication between
the chief information security officer and other entities
concerning security incidents and security breaches, all such
communications and any documents generated based in whole or in
part on such communications are confidential. Notwithstanding
chapter 22 or any other provision of law to the contrary, the
department shall not release such communications pursuant to
state open records laws, and such communications shall not be
received into evidence, subject to discovery, or otherwise
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-7- sc/ns 7/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
used in a trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any
court, regulatory body, or other authority of the state or a
political subdivision of the state, unless the communications
are subject to a protective order that prohibits further
disclosure of such communications and requires any court
filings of such communications to be made under seal. It is
the intent of the general assembly that these prohibitions and
restrictions also apply to federal courts, regulatory bodies,
and other authorities and for purposes of federal open records
laws, to the extent allowed by federal law and court rules.
The chief information security officer shall not release such
communications other than for any of the following purposes:
1. Identifying a cybersecurity threat, including the source
of the cybersecurity threat, or a security vulnerability, and
then only to government officials for purposes of addressing
the threat.
2. Responding to, or otherwise preventing or mitigating,
a specific threat of death, serious bodily harm, or serious
economic harm.
3. Responding to, investigating, prosecuting, or otherwise
preventing or mitigating a serious threat to a minor, including
sexual exploitation and threats to physical safety.
4. Preventing, investigating, disrupting, or prosecuting an
offense under state or federal law.
5. Providing a confidential cybersecurity briefing to the
governor or a member of the general assembly.
Sec. 8. NEW SECTION. 8.98 Criminal justice information.
1. The department is authorized to maintain an integrated
information system that enables automated data sharing among
the executive branch, judicial branch, and local agencies.
2. The department is designated as the Iowa statistical
analysis center for the purpose of coordinating with data
resource agencies to provide data and analytical information
to federal, state, and local governments. Notwithstanding any
other provision of state law to the contrary, unless prohibited
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-8- sc/ns 8/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
by federal law or regulation, the department shall be granted
access, for purposes of research and evaluation, to all of
the data listed in this subsection, except that intelligence
data and peace officer investigative reports maintained
by the department of public safety shall not be considered
data for the purposes of this section. The department of
management and any record, data, or information obtained by the
department under this subsection is subject to the federal and
state confidentiality laws and rules, including as described
in chapter 22, applicable to the original record, data, or
information, and to the original custodian of the record,
data, or information. Authorized access under this subsection
includes but is not limited to all of the following:
a. Juvenile court records and all other information
maintained under sections 232.147 through 232.151.
b. Child abuse information under sections 235A.15 through
235A.19.
c. Dependent adult abuse records maintained under chapter
235B.
d. Criminal history data maintained under chapter 692.
e. Sex offender registry information maintained under
chapter 692A.
f. Presentence investigation reports maintained under
section 901.4.
g. Corrections records maintained under sections 904.601 and
904.602.
h. Community-based correctional program records maintained
under chapter 904.
i. Parole records maintained under chapter 906.
j. Deferred judgment, deferred or suspended sentence, and
probation records maintained under chapter 907.
k. Violation of parole or probation records maintained under
chapter 908.
l. Fine and victim restitution records maintained under
chapters 909 and 910.
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-9- sc/ns 9/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
m. Child welfare records maintained under chapter 235.
3. The department is authorized to provide data analysis and
reporting on issues that may affect the state’s correctional
population and various subgroups of the population. This
reporting may include the review of filed, public legislative
bills, joint resolutions, and amendments, and compiling
criminal justice data for completion of correctional impact
statements under section 2.56, racial impact statements, and an
annual prison population forecast.
4. The department is authorized to maintain a multiagency
information system to track the progress of juveniles and
adults who have been charged with a criminal offense in
the court system through various state and local agencies
and programs. This system must utilize existing databases,
including the Iowa court information system, the Iowa
corrections offender network, the child welfare information
system of the department of health and human services,
the federally mandated national adoption and foster care
information system, and other state and local databases
pertaining to juveniles and to adults who have been charged
with a criminal offense in the court system, to the extent
practicable.
5. The multiagency information system is authorized to
count and track decision points for juveniles in the juvenile
justice system and minors in the child welfare system, evaluate
the experiences of the juveniles and minors, and evaluate
the success of the services provided. The system is also
authorized to count and track decision points for adults who
have been charged with a criminal offense in the court system,
including but not limited to dismissed charges, convictions,
deferred judgments, and sentence information.
6. If the department has insufficient moneys or resources
to implement this section, the department is authorized to
determine which portion of this section may be implemented, if
any, and the remainder of this section shall not apply.
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-10- sc/ns 10/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 9. NEW SECTION. 8.99 Confidentiality of data.
1. For purposes of chapter 22, the department shall not be
deemed to be the lawful custodian of records the department
maintains for another department or establishment under this
subchapter, to the extent the records in question are held
by the department as an automated data processing unit of
government or held by the department solely for storage for
another department or establishment. Such records include but
are not limited to all of the following:
a. Electronic messaging system data.
b. Mainframe data.
c. Storage solutions or other electronic information, such
as on-premises server data storage and cloud data storage.
2. If the department receives a request pursuant to chapter
22 for records over which the department has determined it is
not the lawful custodian, the department shall deny the request
and inform the requester to seek the information from the
lawful custodian as provided in chapter 22. The department’s
determination that it is not the lawful custodian of records is
presumed valid. The presumption may be rebutted by clear and
convincing evidence to the contrary.
3. The department shall provide assistance to the lawful
custodian of records held by the department so that the lawful
custodian can comply with the production obligations of chapter
22.
4. If the department receives a subpoena in an
administrative, civil, or criminal case for records for which
the department is not the lawful custodian, the department
shall notify the lawful custodian and the attorney general’s
office and cooperate in any efforts to resist the subpoena.
Sec. 10. Section 216A.131A, Code 2025, is amended to read
as follows:
216A.131A Criminal and juvenile justice planning.
The department shall fulfill the responsibilities of
this subchapter, including the duties specified in sections
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-11- sc/ns 11/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
216A.133, 216A.135, 216A.136, 216A.137, 216A.138, and 216A.140.
Sec. 11. Section 216A.133, subsection 1, paragraphs d, e, f,
l, and t, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs.
Sec. 12. Section 216A.133, subsection 1, paragraph q,
subparagraphs (1) and (6), Code 2025, are amended by striking
the subparagraphs.
Sec. 13. Section 216A.133, subsection 1, paragraph s, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
s. Provide expertise and advice to the legislative
services agency, the department of management, the department
of corrections, the judicial branch, and others charged
with formulating fiscal, correctional, or minority impact
statements.
Sec. 14. Section 216A.135, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 15. Section 232.147, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
i. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated
in section 216A.136 8.98.
Sec. 16. Section 232.147, subsection 3, paragraph n, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
n. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated
in section 216A.136 8.98.
Sec. 17. Section 232.147, subsection 4, paragraph i, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
i. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated
in section 216A.136 8.98.
Sec. 18. Section 232.149, subsection 5, paragraph f, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
f. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated
in section 216A.136 8.98.
Sec. 19. Section 232.149A, subsection 3, paragraph m, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
m. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated
in section 216A.136 8.98.
LSB 1362XD (7) 91
-12- sc/ns 12/15

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 20. REPEAL. Sections 216A.136, 216A.137, and
216A.138, Code 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 21. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to contracts
entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this
Act:
1. The section of this Act enacting section 8.94.
2. The section of this Act enacting section 8.95.
3. The section of this Act enacting section 8.96.